District of Columbia statutes.
3-1320

Persons ineligible to purchase tickets or shares or receive prizes.

(a)

No ticket or share shall be purchased by, and no prize shall be paid to, any of the following persons: Any member or employee of the Board or any spouse, domestic partner, child, brother, sister, or parent residing as a member of the same household in the principal place of abode of any member or employee of the Board.

(b)

For the purposes of this section, the term “domestic partner” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 32-701(3).

History

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 11(a), 55 DCR 6758

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2520.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-231, designated subsec. (a); in subsec. (a), substituted “spouse or domestic partner” for “spouse”; and added subsec. (b).